Nebraska, session 109, LB510.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2701.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.02 Pursuant to section 77-2715.01:
(1) Until July 1, 1998, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to
section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(2) Commencing July 1, 1998, and until July 1, 1999, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be four and one-half
percent;
(3) Commencing July 1, 1999, and until the start of the first
calendar quarter after July 20, 2002, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(4) Commencing on the start of the first calendar quarter after July
20, 2002, and until July 1, 2023, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent;
(5) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until July 1, 2024, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half
percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on
transactions occurring within a good life district as defined in section
77-4403; and
(6) Commencing July 1, 2024, and until July 1, 2025, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half
percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on
transactions that occur within that portion of a good life district
established pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act which
is located within the corporate limits of a city or village; and .
(7) Commencing July 1, 2025, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent, except
that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on transactions
that occur within that portion of a good life district established
pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act which is located
within the corporate limits of a city or village, but only after such
-2-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
city or village has imposed a sales tax or occupation tax equal to at
least two and three-quarters percent on transactions that occur within
such portion of a good life district established pursuant to the Good
Life Transformational Projects Act which is located within the corporate
limits of a city or village.
Sec. 2. Section 77-4405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4405 (1) If the department finds that creation of the good life
district would not exceed the limits prescribed in subsection (4) of
section 77-4404 and the project described in the application meets the
eligibility requirements of this section, the application shall be
approved.
(2) A project is eligible if:
(a) The applicant demonstrates that the total new development costs
of the project will exceed:
(i) One billion dollars if the project will be located in a city of
the metropolitan class;
(ii) Seven hundred fifty million dollars if the project will be
located in a city of the primary class;
(iii) Five hundred million dollars if the project will be located in
a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) One hundred million dollars if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary
and improvement district within a county with a population of less than
one hundred thousand inhabitants;
(b) The applicant demonstrates that the project will directly or
indirectly result in the creation of:
(i) One thousand new jobs if the project will be located in a city
of the metropolitan class;
(ii) Five hundred new jobs if the project will be located in a city
-3-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
of the primary class;
(iii) Two hundred fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) Fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a city of the
first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary and
improvement district within a county with a population of less than one
hundred thousand inhabitants; and
(c)(i) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more, the applicant
demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at least twenty
percent of sales at the project will be made to persons residing outside
the State of Nebraska or the project will generate a minimum of six
hundred thousand visitors per year who reside outside the State of
Nebraska and the project will attract new-to-market retail to the state
and will generate a minimum of three million visitors per year. Students
from another state who attend a Nebraska public or private university
shall not be counted as out-of-state residents for purposes of this
subdivision; or
(ii) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants, the applicant
demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at least twenty
percent of sales at the project will be made to persons residing outside
the State of Nebraska. Students from another state who attend a Nebraska
public or private university shall not be counted as out-of-state
residents for purposes of this subdivision.
(3) The applicant must certify that any anticipated diversion of
state sales tax revenue will be offset or exceeded by sales tax paid on
anticipated development costs, including construction to real property,
during the same period.
(4) A project is not eligible if:
-4-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
(a) The project includes a licensed racetrack enclosure or an
authorized gaming operator as such terms are defined in section 9-1103,
except that this subdivision shall not apply to infrastructure or
facilities that are (i) publicly owned or (ii) used by or at the
direction of the Nebraska State Fair Board, so long as no gaming devices
or games of chance are expected to be operated by an authorized gaming
operator within any such facilities;
(b) The project received funds pursuant to the Shovel-Ready Capital
Recovery and Investment Act or the Economic Recovery Act, except that
this subdivision shall not apply to any project located in a qualified
inland port district; or
(c) The project includes any portion of a public or private
university.
(5) Approval of an application under this section shall establish
the good life district as that area depicted in the map accompanying the
application as submitted pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section
77-4404. Such district shall last for thirty years and shall not exceed
two thousand acres in size if in a city of the metropolitan class, three
thousand acres in size if in any other class of city or village, or, for
any good life district created within a qualified inland port district,
the size of the qualified inland port district.
(6)(a) Prior to July 1, 2024, any transactions occurring within a
good life district shall be subject to a reduced state sales tax rate as
provided in subdivision (5) of section 77-2701.02.
(b) On and after July 1, 2024, and until July 1, 2025, any
transactions occurring within a good life district shall be subject to a
reduced state sales tax rate as provided in subdivision (6) of section
77-2701.02.
(c) On and after July 1, 2025, any transactions occurring within a
good life district shall be subject to a reduced state sales tax rate as
provided in subdivision (7) of section 77-2701.02.
-5-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
(7) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, a good life district applicant or the city or village in which
all or a portion of the good life district is located may adjust the
boundaries of the district by filing an amended map with the department
and updates or supplements to the application materials originally
submitted by the good life district applicant to demonstrate the
eligibility criteria in subsection (2) of this section will be met after
the boundaries are adjusted. The department shall approve the new
boundaries on the following conditions:
(a) The department determines that the eligibility criteria in
subsection (2) of this section will continue to be met after the proposed
boundary adjustment based on the materials submitted by the party
requesting the boundary adjustment good life district applicant; and
(b) For any area being removed from the district:
(i) The department shall solicit and receive from the city or
village in which all or a portion of the good life district is located
confirmation that no area being removed is attributable to local sources
of revenue which have been pledged for payment of bonds issued pursuant
to the Good Life District Economic Development Act. Confirmation may
include resolutions, meeting minutes, or other official measures adopted
or taken by the city council or village board of trustees; and
(ii) Either the department has received written consent from the
owners of real estate proposed to be removed from the good life district,
or a hearing is held by the department in the manner described in this
subdivision and the department finds that the removal of the affected
property is in the best interests of the state and that the removal is
consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved application for
the good life district. In determining whether removal of the affected
property is consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved
application for the good life district, the department may consider any
formal action taken by the city council or village board of trustees.
-6-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
Proof of such formal action may include resolutions, meeting minutes, or
other official measures adopted or taken. Such hearing must be held at
least ninety days after delivering written notice via certified mail to
the owners of record for the affected real estate proposed to be removed
from the good life district. The hearing must be open to the public and
for the stated purpose of hearing testimony regarding the proposed
removal of property from the good life district. Attendees must be given
the opportunity to speak and submit documentary evidence at, prior to, or
contemporaneously with such hearing for the department to consider in
making its findings.
(8) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, but within twelve months after the approval of the original
application or after any modification is made to the boundaries of a good
life district pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, a city or
village in which any part of the applicable good life district is located
may file a supplemental request to the department to increase the size of
the good life district by up to one thousand acres, which area shall be
in addition to the acreage limit provided in subsection (5) of this
section. The area requested by such city or village may include multiple
separate parcels and such parcels shall be (a) adjacent to the existing
good life district or (b) if not adjacent to the existing good life
district, within or adjacent to the existing corporate limits of the
requesting city or village. Such supplemental request shall be
accompanied by such materials and certifications necessary to demonstrate
that such increase would not negatively impact the criteria that were
necessary for the original establishment of such good life district. Such
request and accompanying materials shall be subject to the same
confidentiality restrictions as provided in subsection (3) of section
77-4404 for applications submitted pursuant to such section.
(9) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section and after any modification is made to the boundaries of a good
-7-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
life district pursuant to this section, the department shall transmit to
any city or village which includes such good life district within its
boundaries or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction (a) all
information held by the department related to the application and
approval of the application, (b) all documentation which describes the
property included within the good life district, and (c) all
documentation transmitted to the applicant for such good life district
with approval of the application and establishment of the good life
district. Such city or village shall be subject to the same
confidentiality restrictions as provided in subsection (3) of section
77-4404, except that all such documents, plans, and specifications
included in the application which the city or village determine define or
describe the project may be provided upon written request of any person
who owns property in the applicable good life district.
(10) After establishment of a good life district that exceeds one
thousand acres in size, but only after written approval of the city or
village which includes such good life district within its boundaries or
within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, the good life district
applicant may apply to the department to establish development and design
standards for the good life district. Such standards may include, but are
not limited to, standards for architectural design, landscape design,
construction materials, and sustainability, but may not require property
owners to utilize specific contractors, professionals, suppliers, or
service providers. The department may approve the standards after holding
a hearing after one hundred eighty days' notice to all property owners in
the district if the department finds that the standards will ensure a
comprehensive and cohesive character and aesthetic for development in the
good life district, and that the standards will further the purposes of
the Good Life Transformational Projects Act. The development and design
standards must be commercially reasonable and consistent with terminology
and accepted practices in the architecture industry, must not conflict
-8-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
with any building code or other similar law or regulation, and must not
impose an undue burden on property owners in the district. If approved,
the standards shall apply to all new construction inside of the good life
district. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any such standards established
by the department shall be in addition and supplemental to any local
zoning, building code, comprehensive plan, or similar requirements of the
city or village, which requirements of the city or village shall control
to the extent of any conflict with any design standards established by
the department.
(11) Demonstration of meeting the required new development costs for
purposes of subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be established by
evidence submitted by the good life district applicant, the city or
village where the good life district is located, or any other person
which submits satisfactory evidence to the department.
Sec. 3. Section 77-4406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4406 (1) The department shall only terminate a good life district
established pursuant to section 77-4405 if:
(a) Commitments for ten percent of the investment threshold required
under subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-4405 have not been made within
three years after establishment of such district;
(b) Commitments for fifty percent of the investment threshold
required under subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-4405 have not been made
within seven years after establishment of such district; or
(c) Commitments for seventy-five percent of the investment threshold
required under subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-4405 have not been made
within ten years after establishment of such district.
(2) The department shall measure the amount of commitments for such
investment from evidence submitted by the good life district applicant,
the city or village in which all or a portion of the district is located,
or any other source. The department shall accept evidence from other
-9-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
sources so long as the expenditure evidence submitted is related to any
portion of the project described in the application as amended or
supplemented. All evidence shall be certified by the good life district
applicant or such city or village in which all or a portion of the
district is located stating that the evidence submitted represents
commitments for investment in the project described in the application.
All such evidence of commitments for investment shall be accepted by the
department and counted toward the applicable threshold. Within thirty
days after the end of each calendar quarter, the department shall provide
a summary of the total commitments for investment received by the
department and counted toward the investment threshold required under
subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-4405 to the good life district applicant
and to the city or village in which all or a portion of the district is
located until the investment threshold required under subdivision (2)(a)
of section 77-4405 has been met for the applicable good life district.
determined appropriate by the department.
(3) Prior to terminating a good life district as provided in this
section, the department shall provide written notice to all property
owners within the approved good life district and the city or village
which includes such good life district within its boundaries or within
its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction that the department intends to
terminate such district. Such property owners, city or village shall have
ninety days after receipt of such written notice from the department to
assume the statutory role and responsibilities of the applicable good
life district applicant. If a property owner or owners or the city or
village assumes such role and responsibilities, the measurement
thresholds provided in subsection (1) of this section shall each be
extended by two hundred and seventy-five days or two hundred and seventy-
five days beyond the date of such assumption of role and
responsibilities, whichever is later. Upon a property owner or owners or
the city or village assuming the role and responsibilities of the good
-10-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
life district applicant, such property owner or owners or city or village
shall be deemed the good life district applicant for all purposes of the
Good Life Transformational Projects Act, the Good Life District Economic
Development Act, and any other applicable provision of Nebraska law.
(4) The department shall not terminate a good life district prior to
three years after the establishment of a good life district.
Sec. 4. Section 77-4411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4411 (1) The authority of a city to establish a good life
district economic development program and to appropriate local sources of
revenue to such program is subject to approval by a vote of a majority of
the registered voters of the city voting upon the question.
(2) The question may be submitted to the voters at a special
election or such question may be voted on at an election held in
conjunction with the statewide primary or statewide general election. The
question may be submitted to the voters before or after any application
is submitted to establish a good life district pursuant to the Good Life
Transformational Projects Act.
(3) A city shall order submission of the question to the registered
voters by resolution. The resolution shall contain the entire wording of
the ballot question, which shall state the question as follows: "Shall
the [city or village] of [name of the city or village] be authorized to
establish a good life district economic development program for any area
within the [city or village] which is included in a good life district
established pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and
shall the [city or village] be authorized to appropriate the local
sources of revenue collected within such good life district program area,
which may include local option sales and use taxes and occupation taxes,
established pursuant to and as permitted by the Good Life District
Economic Development Act?"
(4) The city shall file a copy of the resolution calling the
-11-

LB510 LB510
2025 2025
election with the election commissioner or county clerk not later than
the eighth Friday prior to a special election or a municipal primary or
general election which is not held at the statewide primary or general
election, or not later than March 1 prior to a statewide primary election
or September 1 prior to a statewide general election. The election shall
be conducted in accordance with the Election Act.
(5) If a majority of those voting on the issue vote in favor of the
question, the governing body may establish and implement a good life
district economic development program upon the terms contained in the
Good Life District Economic Development Act. If a majority of those
voting on the issue vote against the question, the governing body shall
not establish or implement any good life district economic development
program. When the question of establishing a good life district economic
development program is defeated at an election, resubmission of the
question and an election on the question shall not be held until at least
five months have passed from and after the date of such election.
(6) Notwithstanding a favorable vote to establish an economic
development program, a city or village may not use eminent domain to
acquire property within a good life district for the purpose of giving or
selling such property to a private individual or corporation.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-2701.02, 77-4405, 77-4406, and
77-4411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-12-